Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.020

Date.

(1) On the second Tuesday in March of each year in which a president of the United States is to be nominated and elected, a presidential primary shall be held at which voters may vote for the nominee of a major political party for the office of president.

(2)(a) The secretary of state may propose an alternative date for the primary, including to coordinate a regional primary with any of the following states: Alaska, Arizona, California, Hawaii, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, Oregon, and Utah, no later than the first day of September of the year before the year in which a president is to be nominated and elected. The proposed date must not be prior to the earliest date permitted by the national rules of the major political parties.

(b) No later than the fifteenth day of September of the year before the year in which a presidential nominee is selected, the state committee of any major political party that will use the primary results for candidates of that party may propose an alternative date for that primary.

(3) If an alternative date is proposed under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section, a committee consisting of the chair and the vice chair of the state committee of each major political party, the secretary of state, the majority leader and minority leader of the senate, and the speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives shall meet and, if affirmed by a two-thirds vote of the members of the committee, the date of the primary shall be changed. The committee shall meet and decide on the proposed alternate date not later than the first day of October of the year before the year in which a presidential nominee is selected. The secretary of state shall convene and preside over the meeting of the committee. A committee member other than a legislator may appoint, in writing, a designee to serve on his or her behalf. A legislator who is a member of the committee may appoint, in writing, another legislator to serve on his or her behalf.

(4) If an alternate date is approved under this section, the secretary of state shall adopt rules under RCW 29A.04.620 to adjust the deadlines in RCW 29A.56.031 and related provisions of this chapter to correspond with the date that has been approved.

[ 2019 c 7 s 1; 2003 c 111 s 1402; (2011 c 319 s 1 expired January 1, 2013); (2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 2 expired January 1, 2005); (2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 1 expired July 1, 2004). Prior: 1995 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1; 1989 c 4 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 99). Formerly RCW 29.19.020.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2011 c 319: "Section 1 of this act expires January 1, 2013." [ 2011 c 319 s 2.]

Effective date—2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2004." [ 2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 5.]

Expiration date—2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 2: "Section 2 of this act expires January 1, 2005." [ 2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 6.]

Expiration date—2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 1: "Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2004." [ 2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 4.]

Effective date—2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 1: "Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [December 9, 2003]." [ 2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 3.]

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 20: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 15, 1995]." [ 1995 1st sp.s. c 20 s 7.]